Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2937
Confidentiality.

Unless subject to the Open Meetings Act or sections 84-712 to 84-712.09, mediation communications are confidential to the extent agreed by the parties or provided by other law or rule of this state.

Laws 2003, LB 255, § 8;

Laws 2004, LB 821, § 9.

Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.